vi: Tỷ lệ/kích thước mô hình khủng long trong bộ đồ chơi: Rất lớn; Lớn; Vừa; Siêu nhỏ/mini; Kích thước hỗn hợp; Nhỏ; Khác
bg-BG: Клас на мащаба/размера на фигурките в комплекта с динозаври: Много голям; Голям; Среден; Микро/мини; Смесени размери; Малък; Друго
ja: 恐竜プレイセットスケール／図のサイズクラス: 特大; 大; 中; マイクロ/ミニ; ミックスサイズ; 小; その他
ko: 공룡 놀이 세트 축척/피규어 크기 등급: 특대형; 대형; 중형; 마이크로/미니; 혼합 사이즈; 소형; 기타
it: Dinosauro playset scala/figure taglia class: Extra grande; Grande; Medio; Micro/mini; Dimensioni miste; Piccolo; Altro
ru: Масштаб игрового набора с динозаврами/размер фигурок: Очень большой; Большой; Средний; Микро/мини; Смешанные размеры; Маленький; Другое
zh-TW: 恐龍玩具組比例/公仔尺寸等級: 特大; 大; 中; 微型/迷你; 混合尺寸; 小; 其他
nb: Dinosaur lekesett skala/figur størrelse klasse: Ekstra stor; Stor; Medium; Mikro/mini; Blandede størrelser; Liten; Annet
ro-RO: Dimensiunea setului de joc cu dinozauri/clasa de dimensiuni a figurinelor: Foarte mare; Mare; Mediu; Micro/mini; Mărimi mixte; Mic; Altele
da: Størrelsesklasse for dinosaur-legesæt/figurer: Ekstra stor; Stor; Mellem; Mikro/mini; Blandede størrelser; Lille; Anden
de: Größenklasse/Maßstab des Dinosaurier-Spielsets: Extra groß; Groß; Mittel; Mikro/Mini; Gemischte Größen; Klein; Sonstige
sl-SI: Igralni komplet dinozavrov v merilu/figuri velikosti: Zelo veliko; Veliko; Srednje; Mikro/mini; Mešane velikosti; Majhno; Drugo
pt-PT: Dinossauro playset expansão/figura classe tamanho: Extra grande; Grande; Médio; Micro/mini; Tamanhos mistos; Pequeno; Outro
fi: Dinosauruslelusetin tai -lelun mittasuhde: Erittäin suuri; Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Mikro/mini; Eri kokoja; Pieni; Muu
en: Dinosaur playset scale/figure size class: Extra large; Large; Medium; Micro/mini; Mixed sizes; Small; Other
fr: Taille ou échelle des figurines de l’ensemble de dinosaures: Très grand; Grand; Moyen; Micro/mini; Tailles variées; Petit; Autre
cs: Měřítko dinosauří herní sady/kategorie velikosti figurky: Extra velké; Velké; Střední; Mikro/mini; Smíšené velikosti; Malé; Ostatní
nl: Dinosaurus speelset schaal/figuur grootteklasse: Extra groot; Groot; Medium; Micro/mini; Gemengde maten; Klein; Overig
es: Clase de tamaño de las figuras/escala del set de juego de dinosaurios: Extra grande; Grande; Mediano; Micro/mini; Tamaños mixtos; Pequeño; Otro
hr-HR: Set za igru s dinosaurima u mjerilu/veličini klase: Iznimno veliko; Veliko; Srednje; Mikro / mini; Mješovite veličine; Malo; Ostalo
pt-BR: Conjunto de dinossauros em escala/classe de tamanho dos bonecos: Extra grande; Grande; Médio; Micro/mini; Tamanhos variados; Pequeno; Outro
sv: Dinosaur playset skala/figure storlek class: Extra stor; Stor; Medium; Mikro/mini; Blandade storlekar; Liten; Övrigt
el: Κλίμακα/κατηγορία μεγέθους των φιγούρων του σετ παιχνιδιού με δεινόσαυρους: Πολύ μεγάλο; Μεγάλο; Μεσαίο; Μικροσκοπικό/Μίνι; Διάφορα μεγέθη; Μικρό; Άλλο
lt-LT: Dinozaurų žaidimų rinkinio mastelio / figūrėlių dydžio klasė: Ypač didelis; Didelis; Vidutinis; Mikro / mini; Įvairūs dydžiai; Mažas; Kita
zh-CN: 恐龙玩具套装比例/人偶尺寸等级: 特大号; 大号; 中号; 微型/迷你号; 混合尺寸; 小号; 其他
pl: Skala/klasa rozmiaru figurek w zestawie dinozaurów: Bardzo duże; Duże; Średnie; Mikro/mini; Mieszane rozmiary; Małe; Inne
tr: Dinozor oyun seti ölçeği/figür boyutu sınıfı: Ekstra büyük; Büyük; Orta; Mikro/mini; Karışık boyutlar; Küçük; Diğer
hu: Dinoszauruszos játékkészlet mértékének/figuraméretének besorolása: Extra nagy; Nagy; Közepes; Mikro/mini; Vegyes méretek; Kicsi; Egyéb
th: หมวดหมู่มาตราส่วน/ขนาดของหุ่นโมเดลในชุดของเล่นไดโนเสาร์: ใหญ่พิเศษ; ใหญ่; กลาง; ไมโคร/มินิ; คละขนาด; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Mierka hracej súpravy/veľkostná trieda figúrok dinosaurov: Extra veľké; Veľké; Stredné; Mikro/mini; Zmiešané veľkosti; Malé; Iné